Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 4. Duties of Operators

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals §§ 334 to 446.

§ 30-2-401.
Safety rules; posting; responsibility for observance.

All owners, operators and mine site contractors shall post in a conspicuous place and make available to all employees the rules and duties of safety governing their employment. Employees are responsible for the observance of all the rules and safety practices in all phases of their work.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 51; W.S. 1957, § 30-86; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-423; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2005, ch. 106, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “and mine site contractors,” and made a stylistic change.

§ 30-2-402.
Annual report to inspector; contents.

The owner, operator or mine site contractor of any mining operation shall report annually to the inspector before January 31 of each year. The report shall contain the names of the owners, operators and mine site contractors, the post office address, the name of the claim to be operated, the number of persons employed, classified as to occupation, the name of the county mining district, and the tonnage produced during the previous calendar year, upon forms furnished by the inspector.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 23, § 8; ch. 35, § 6; C.S 1910, §§ 3488, 3542; Laws 1919, ch. 126, § 17; C.S. 1920, §§ 4411, 4472; Laws 1925, ch. 79, § 5; R.S. 1931, §§ 23-154, 70-206; C.S. 1945, §§ 57-205, 57-806; Laws 1949, ch. 131, § 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-118, 30-208; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-3-225, 30-4-205; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2003, ch. 5, § 1; 2005, ch. 106, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, twice inserted references to mine site contractors, and made related changes.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 11, ch. 23, Laws 1903, repealed R.S. 1899, ch. 8, Title 3, div. 1.

§ 30-2-403.
Record of accidents to be kept; inspection of record; reports filed with inspector; report of serious accidents.

The owner, operator or mine site contractor shall keep a record of all accidents occurring in connection with mining operations. The record shall be open to the inspector or his deputies at all times.

In all compensable injuries, the owner, operator or mine site contractor shall send to the inspector a copy of the report of injury form filed in worker’s compensation cases.

A mine owner, operator or mine site contractor shall immediately notify the inspector’s office in person or by conversing with an individual of that office by telephone of any of the following occurrences:

An accident that has caused a fatality or serious injury;

Any explosion of gas or dust underground;

Any fire occurring underground or in any structure immediately adjacent to or attached to any mine opening;

A cave-in or roof or rib fall which:

Impairs ventilation;

Impedes passage to and from work; or

Has the potential to cause a serious injury.

Damage to hoisting equipment, shafts or slopes which cause delay of normal operations.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, §§ 12, 26; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-51, 30-60; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-306

, 30-2-315; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2005, ch. 106, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to employer's report of injury under Worker's Compensation Act, see §

27-14-506

.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “or mine site contractor” throughout the section; in (b) substituted “report of injury form” for “employer's report”; in (c) substituted “conversing with an individual of that office by telephone” for “electronic means”; and made stylistic changes throughout.

§ 30-2-404.
Notification of change in ownership, etc., of mining property.

The inspector shall be informed promptly of any change in the name, ownership or operator of any operating mining property.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 30-61; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-316; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-2-405.
Notice as to commencement of operations.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 106, § 2.

The owner or operator of a mine shall notify the inspector whenever a new mine is opened, or whenever an existing mine is either closed or reopened. The notice shall be given immediately before the happening of the event, and shall specify the date upon which the event will occur.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 95, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 57-444; Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 37; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-62, 30-145; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-317, 30-3-416; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2005, ch. 106, §§ 1, 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, repealed former (a), which provided that the owner or operator provide notice of commencement of a mining operation within 30 days of commencement; in (b), deleted provisions requiring notice to be in writing; and made a stylistic change.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 3, ch. 95, Laws 1937, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 30-2-406.
Barrier pillars required; penalty for failure to leave.

The operator of every mine which has another coal or mineral property contiguous or immediately adjacent to it shall leave barrier pillars at least fifty (50) feet in width along the boundary line of the contiguous coal or mineral property. Owners of adjacent properties are not prohibited from extracting the coal or mineral along the boundary line if they enter into a written agreement providing the pillars may be pulled.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment of not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 70, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 23-102, 23-103; C.S. 1945, §§ 57-404, 57-405; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-134, 30-135; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-3-405, 30-3-406; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-2-407.
Abandonment or closing down of mine; procedures to be followed.

No owner or operator shall abandon or indefinitely close down any underground mine until the inspector performs a final inspection.

Upon abandonment or closing down of an underground mine, the owner or operator shall effectively close or fence off all surface openings through which persons or animals could fall or enter.

Upon abandonment or closing down of a strip or open-pit mine, mining or prospecting pit or excavation, appropriate action shall be taken where necessary to safeguard against injury to persons or animals.

Within thirty (30) days after abandonment or closing down of any underground mine, the owner or operator shall file with the inspector a map showing all pertinent data as of the date of closing or abandonment in the form prescribed by the inspector. The map and all data shown thereon shall be confidential and not open for public inspection until (2) consecutive years have elapsed without resumption of mining activity, unless release has been authorized in writing by the owner or unless release is necessary for safety reasons shown by an adjoining operator or other person.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 80, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2562; C.S. 1910, § 3505; Laws 1919, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4428; Laws 1927, ch. 51, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 23-101; C.S. 1945, § 57-401; 1957, ch. 160, § 25; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-59, 30-131; Laws 1959, ch. 99, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 65, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-314,

30-3-402

, 30-3-431, 30-3-432; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Cited

in

Chicago & N.W. Ry. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 30-2-408.
Maps of mines to be made; contents; semiannual revision; maintenance and filing.

The owner or operator of each mine shall make an accurate map or plan of the mine and mine workings on a scale not exceeding two hundred (200) feet to the inch or as otherwise approved by the inspector. The map or plan shall:

Exhibit all openings or excavations, shafts, tunnels, slopes, planes, gangways, entries, cross headings, rooms and installations related to safety;

Show the direction of air currents in the mine;

Accurately delineate the boundary line between the mine and adjoining mines;

Be prepared with reference to and show the boundaries of the legal subdivision in which the mine is located;

Be accurately brought up to date every six (6) months.

The owner or operator shall:

Maintain a copy of each map or plan for use at the mine by the inspector, his deputy or any miner employed at the mine;

File a copy of each map or plan with the inspector;

Maintain a copy of the current map or plan on bulletin boards near mine entrances and at all principal working stations.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 80, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2562; C.S. 1910, § 3505; Laws 1919, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4428; Laws 1927, ch. 51, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 23-101; C.S. 1945, § 57-401; Laws 1957, ch. 160, §§ 44, 55; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-80, 30-90, 30-131; Laws 1977, ch. 65, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-417, 30-2-427,

30-3-402

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 23, ch. 80, Laws 1890-91, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 30-2-409.
Survey and platting of underground workings by county surveyor; fees; notice to mine owner; hindering surveyor prohibited; penalty.

The county surveyor shall, upon the written request of an adjoining landowner, enter and make a complete, true and accurate survey and plat of the underground workings of any mine in the county to ascertain the location of the workings with respect to the boundary line of the property of the adjoining landowner. The county surveyor shall make an official plat and report of the survey to the adjoining landowner. The county surveyor shall receive from the adjoining landowner the same fees allowed by law for county surveying. If the county surveyor is interested in either of the adjoining properties or is not qualified to make the survey, he shall call a competent engineer who is not interested in the properties to make the survey and plat. The county surveyor may take any necessary action to aid him in making the survey and plat. The county surveyor shall give the mine owner or operator ten (10) days written notice of the date the survey will begin.

The owner, operator or any person in charge of any mine shall not hinder, delay or prevent the county surveyor, or engineer substituted for him from entering the mine, from making the survey and plat, or from performing his duties under subsection (a) of this section. Any person violating this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 12, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, §§ 4459, 4460; R.S. 1931, §§ 23-143, 23-144; C.S. 1945, §§ 57-402, 57-403; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-132, 30-133; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-3-403, 30-3-404; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to manner and method of making surveys generally, see §§

18-3-702

through

18-3-704

.